Illinois, session 104th, SB2911.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. "An Act concerning appropriations", approved 5with items reduced June 16, 2025, Public Act 104-3, is amended 6by adding Section 87 to Article 55 as follows: 7    (P.A. 104-3, Art. 55, Sec. 87 new)8    Sec. 87. In addition to any amounts heretofore 9appropriated to the Department of Human Services for 10Community-Based Services for Persons with Developmental 11Disabilities and for Intermediate Care Facilities for the 12Developmentally Disabled and Alternative Community Programs, 13the amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that sum as may be 14necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 15the Department of Human Services to fund transition grants 16awarded under the Section 14(c) transition program to assist 17community agencies with active or pending 14(c) certificates 18transition away from subminimum wages for workers with 19disabilities. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.